Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.300

Public deposit protection—Report.

By December 1, 2009, and each December 1st thereafter, the office of the state treasurer shall report to the legislature actions taken by the public deposit protection commission and the state treasurer regarding public deposit protection.

[ 2009 c 9 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.